District of Columbia statutes.
1-309.15

Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions; appointment of Executive Director.

(a)

There is hereby established an Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (“Office”) to provide technical, administrative, and financial reporting assistance to the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions. Subject to appropriations beginning in Fiscal Year 2001, the Office shall be funded by an annual budget allocation. The Office is intended to support the efforts of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions and is not empowered to direct or supervise the actions of Commissions.

(b)

The Office shall be headed by an Executive Director who shall be appointed by the Council.

(c)

Funds may be transferred from the Office of Advisory Neighborhood Commissions through an intra-District transfer for the operations of the Office.

History

Oct. 10, 1975, D.C. Law 1-21, § 18
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-135, § 3(e), 47 DCR 2741
Mar. 6, 2002, D.C. Law 14-80, § 2(b), 48 DCR 11268

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-309.06.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-80 rewrote subsec. (b) and added subsec. (c).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Advisory Neighborhood Commission Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-21, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9091).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Advisory Neighborhood Commission Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-56, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4410).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Advisory Neighborhood Commission Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-104, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7149).